Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-4,118
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Learning Community Reorganization Act:

(1) Learning community has the definition found in section 79-2101;

(2) Reorganization of school districts means the formation of new school districts that will become members of a learning community, the alteration of boundaries of established school districts that are members of a learning community, the dissolution or disorganization of established school districts that are members of a learning community through or by means of any one or combination of the methods set out in section 79-4,120, and any other alteration of school district boundaries involving a school district that is a member of a learning community; and

(3) State committee means the State Committee for the Reorganization of School Districts created by section 79-435.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 29.